Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-1232
Wireless services, defined.

Wireless services means any services using licensed or unlicensed spectrum, including the use of Wi-Fi, whether mobile or at a fixed location, provided to the public using wireless facilities.

Laws 2019, LB184, § 32.